Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-404
Nebraska Art Collection; program; how administered.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska may establish a Nebraska Art Collection program at the University of Nebraska at Kearney. The Nebraska Art Collection shall be administered by the Board of Regents and the chief administrative officer of the University of Nebraska at Kearney. The Board of Regents shall designate a curator for the collection. The Board of Regents shall appoint any advisory committees it deems necessary to aid in the administration of the art collection.

Laws 1979, LB 116, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 14.